Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A child in foster care shall not be housed in the following conditions, except in
emergency situations not exceeding twenty-four (24) hours:
(a) Vehicles, including but not limited to cars, vans, and buses;
(b) State or cabinet offices; or
(c) Hotels, motels, or short-term rentals.
(2) A child in foster care shall be placed in one (1) of the following:
(a) A fictive kin placement;
(b) A kinship care placement;
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/22/2026 12:03 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1842
(c) A licensed foster family home; or
(d) A Licensed child-caring facility.
(3) A child in foster care shall not be moved more than two (2) times in a twelve (12)
month period unless extenuating circumstances such as safety concerns or
reunification efforts necessitate the change.
(4) An employee of the cabinet shall provide a written explanation for any placement
change beyond the initial placement to the secretary, and the placement change
shall be approved by the secretary.
(5) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section and to minimize placement disruptions
and prioritize stability .
Section 2. KRS 620.320 is amended to read as follows:
The duties of the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall be to:
(1) Establish, approve, and provide training programs for local citizen foster care
review board members;
(2) Review and coordinate the activities of local citizen foster care review boards;
(3) Establish reporting procedures to be followed by the local citizen foster care review
boards and publish an annual written report compiling data reported by local foster
care review boards which shall include statistics relating, at a minimum, to the
following:
(a) Barriers to permanency identified in reviews;
(b) The number of children moved more than two[three] (2)[(3)] times within a
twelve[six] (12)[(6)] month period;
(c) The average length of time in care;
(d) Local solutions reported to meet identified barriers; and
(e) The total number and frequency of reviews;
(4) Publish an annual written report on the effectiveness of such local citizen foster
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/22/2026 12:03 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1842
care review boards; and
(5) Evaluate and make annual recommendations to the Supreme Court, the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Families
and Children, and the Governor regarding:
(a) Laws of the Commonwealth;
(b) Practices, policies, and procedures within the Commonwealth affecting
permanence for children in out-of-home placement and the investigation of
allegations of abuse and neglect;
(c) The findings of the local citizen foster care review board community forums
conducted pursuant to KRS 620.270; and
(d) The effectiveness or lack thereof and reasons therefor of local citizen foster
care review of children in the custody of the cabinet in bringing about
permanence for the Commonwealth's children.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/22/2026 12:03 PM Jacketed